Florida, session 2026, SB534.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 31 32 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âHunger-Free Campus 33 Act.â 34 Section 2.â(1)âSubject to legislative appropriation, the 35 Hunger-Free Campus Pilot Program is established within the 36 Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services to support 37 efforts to fight hunger on the campuses of public postsecondary 38 educational institutions. The pilot program is established for a 39 period of 1 year, beginning July 1, 2026. 40 (2)âFor purposes of this section, the term: 41 (a)ââCommissionerâ means the Commissioner of Agriculture. 42 (b)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Agriculture and 43 Consumer Services. 44 (3)(a)âThe commissioner shall identify from among all state 45 universities and Florida College System institutions the three 46 that have the highest percentage of Pell Grant-eligible 47 students, which universities or institutions shall participate 48 in the pilot program. 49 (b)âThe commissioner shall also develop the survey 50 instrument described in subsection (4). 51 (4)âA participating state university or Florida College 52 System institution shall: 53 (a)âEstablish a hunger task force, which must include 54 representatives from the student body and meet at least three 55 times during the life of the pilot program. The task force shall 56 set at least two goals to address hunger on campus, each 57 accompanied by an action plan. 58 (b)âDesignate a staff member responsible for assisting 59 students with enrollment in the Supplemental Nutrition 60 Assistance Program (SNAP) as defined in s. 414.456(1), Florida 61 Statutes. 62 (c)âProvide options that enable students to use SNAP 63 benefits on campus or provide students with information on 64 authorized SNAP retailers in the area surrounding the campus 65 where they may use SNAP electronic benefit transfer cards. 66 (d)âHost an activity or event during Hunger and 67 Homelessness Awareness Week to promote awareness of hunger on 68 the nationâs campuses. 69 (e)âProvide at least one physical food pantry on campus or 70 enable students to receive food at no cost through a stigma-free 71 process. The campus may partner with a local food bank or food 72 pantry to comply with this paragraph. 73 (f)âDevelop a student meal credit donation program or 74 designate funds that might be raised through such a program for 75 free food vouchers. 76 (g)âConduct a student survey on hunger, using a survey 77 instrument developed by the commissioner, and submit the results 78 of the survey and a best practices campus profile to the 79 department by a date prescribed by the department for inclusion 80 in a comparative profile of each campus designated as a hunger 81 free campus. 82 (5)(a)âEach participating state university or Florida 83 College System institution shall submit a report to the 84 department, in a manner prescribed by the department, which 85 describes how it implemented the pilot program and the program 86 results. 87 (b)âThe commissioner shall submit a report on the pilot 88 program to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the 89 Speaker of the House of Representatives by January 1, 2028. The 90 report must include, but need not be limited to, the impact of 91 the program on establishing hunger-free campuses at 92 participating state universities or Florida College System 93 institutions; the impact of the program on reducing the number 94 of students at such universities and institutions who are 95 experiencing food insecurity; and recommendations regarding 96 future funding and implementation of the program on a long-term 97 basis. 98 (6)âThe department may adopt rules to implement the 99 program. 100 Section 3.â(1)âThe Office of Program Policy Analysis and 101 Government Accountability (OPPAGA) shall conduct a study to 102 evaluate food insecurity on the campuses of state universities 103 and Florida College System institutions. 104 (2)âThe study must include recommendations for any changes 105 to general law, Board of Governorsâ regulations, or State Board 106 of Education rules needed to address food insecurity on the 107 campuses of state universities and Florida College System 108 institutions. 109 (3)âIn conducting the study, OPPAGA shall consult with the 110 Board of Governors of the State University System, the board of 111 trustees of the Florida College System, the Department of 112 Education, and any other relevant stakeholders. 113 (4)âOPPAGA shall submit a report on its findings to the 114 President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of 115 Representatives by December 1, 2026. 116 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.